Mississippi, session 2026, SB2606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  For the purposes of this section, "name, image and likeness activity" means any activity associated with publicity rights as defined in Section 37-97-103. (2)  State Institutions of Higher Learning shall provide mandatory annual financial literacy workshops for student-athletes engaged in name, image and likeness activities.  Such workshops shall also be made available, but not mandated, for student-athletes not engaged in name, image and likeness activities.  At minimum, each annual workshop must include information concerning contracts, taxation of name, image and likeness income, budgeting, credit management, investments and avoidance of predatory financial or legal arrangements. (3)  Institutions may contract with the Mississippi Department of Education, the Mississippi Department of Banking and Consumer Finance or other qualified organizations to conduct the workshops as required by this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.